epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/sr_Cyrl.xml
		.ра3з4бој
		.ра3з4бор
		.ра3з4ев
		.ра3з4гађ
		.ра3з4грт
		.ра3з4иђ
		.ра3з4ић
		.ра3з4ид
		.ра3з4иј
		.ра3з4ин
		.ра3з4ир
		.ра3з4из
		.ра3з4лаг
		.ра3з4лаз
		.ра3з4лич
		.ра3з4лик
		.ра3з4лож
		.ра3з4лог
		.ра3з4лоз
		.ра3з4мећ
		.ра3з4мет
		.ра3з4мрск
		.ра3з4нат
		.ра3з4ред
		.ра3з4роч
		.ра3з4рок
		.ра3з4вал
		.ра3з4веде
		.ра3з4вест
		.ра3з4вић
		.ра3з4виго
		.ра3з4вија
		.ра3з4вије
		.ра3з4вију
		.ра3з4вит
		.ра3з4вој
		.ра3з4вон
		.ра3з4врћ
		.ра3з4враћ
		.ра3з4врат
		.ра3з4врт
		.ра4с5турч
		.раз3д2ни
		.раз3г2н
		.раза3г2н
		.раза3т2ка
		.с2
		.су2б3а
		.су2б3инв
		.су2б3јунк
		.су2б3л
		.су2б3окс
		.су2б3орд
		.су2б3реп
		.су2б3рог
		.су3б4аш
		.супе2р3а
		.супе2р3е
		.супе2р3и
		.супе2р3о
		.супе2р3у
		.супе3р4иор
		.тран2с3а
		.тран2с3ц
		.тран2с3е
		.тран2с3к
		.тран2с3л
		.тран2с3м
		.тран2с3н
		.тран2с3о
		.тран2с3п
		.тран2с3т
		.тран2с3у
		.тран2с3в
		.тран3с4еп
		.тран3с4кри
		.тран3с4уд
		.тран3с4ум
		.у2ш3ћ
		.у2ш3ч
		.у2с3ц
		.у2с3к
		.у2с3п
		.у2с3талас
		.у2с3тара
		.у2с3тећ
		.у2с3тег
		.у2с3тер
		.у2с3тов
		.у2с3трћ
		.у2с3трч
		.у2с3трај
		.у2с3трал
		.у2с3треб
		.у2с3треп
		.у2с3трес
		.у2с3трг
		.у2с3трк
		.у2с3трн
		.у2с3трп
		.у2с3тућ
		.у2с3тум
		.у2с3тур
		.у2с3тврђ
		.у2с3тврд
		.у2з3б
		.у2з3д
		.у2з3г
		.у2з3и
		.у2з3игр
		.у2з3инат
		.у2з3искр
		.у2з3л
		.у2з3љ
		.у2з3м
		.у2з3н
		.у2з3њ
		.у2з3обест
		.у2з3обијест
		.у2з3охо
		.у2з3орат
		.у2з3орав
		.у2з3р
		.у2з3угар
		.у2з3в
		.у3г2ми
		.у3г2н
		.у3с4как
		.у3с4клађ
		.у3с4клад
		.у3с4ко
		.у3с4куп
		.у3с4пало
		.у3с4пав
		.у3с4пеш
		.у3с4пех
		.у3с4пел
		.у3с4пем
		.у3с4пент
		.у3с4пет
		.у3с4пев
		.у3с4пија
		.у3с4пије
		.у3с4пијуш
		.у3с4пикуш
		.у3с4пјеш
		.у3с4пјех
		.у3с4пјел
		.у3с4пјем
		.у3с4пјет
		.у3с4пјев
		.у3с4пон
		.у3с4пора
		.у3с4пореч
		.у3с4порен
		.у3с4порењ
		.у3с4пори
		.у3с4пособ
		.у3с4према
		.у3с4преми
		.у3с4рђ
		.у3с4рж
		.у3с4ра
		.у3с4рд
		.у3с4ре
		.у3с4ријед
		.у3с4рк
		.у3с4рљ
		.у3с4рн
		.у3с4рп
		.у3з4бор
		.у3з4диц
		.у3з4лан
		.у3з4лат
		.у3з4лић
		.у3з4лиц
		.у3з4лим
		.у3з4лит
		.у3з4лов
		.у3з4лудоб
		.у3з4нач
		.у3з4нак
		.у3з4неве
		.у3з4невје
		.у3з4нич
		.у3з4ниц
		.у3з4ној
		.у3з4рет
		.у3з4рев
		.у3з4ријет
		.у3з4ријев
		.у3з4рн
		.у3з4рњ
		.у3з4роч
		.у3з4рока
		.у3з4роко
		.у3з4року
		.у3з4руј
		.у3з4ван
		.у3з4ват
		.у3з4виж
		.у3з4вија
		.у3з4вије
		.у3з4вијо
		.у3з4вију
		.у3з4вој
		.у4с5кош
		.у4с5коко
		.у4с5коле
		.у4с5колу
		.у4с5ком
		.у4с5копа
		.у4с5кора
		.у4с5коси
		.у4с5котр
		.у4с5ков
		.уза3т2ка
		.ва2н3евр
		.ва2н3устав
		.з2
		.за3г2н
		.за3т2ка
		2ђ1ђ
		2ђ1ћ
		2ђ1ч
		2ђ1ш
		2ђ1ж
		2ђ1б
		2ђ1ц
		2ђ1д
		2ђ1џ
		2ђ1ф
		2ђ1г
		2ђ1х
		2ђ1к
		2ђ1љ
		2ђ1м
		2ђ1н
		2ђ1р
		2ђ1с
		2ђ1з
		2ћ1ђ
		2ћ1ћ
		2ћ1ч
		2ћ1ш
		2ћ1ж
		2ћ1б
		2ћ1ц
		2ћ1д
		2ћ1џ
		2ћ1ф
		2ћ1г
		2ћ1х
		2ћ1к
		2ћ1љ
		2ћ1м
		2ћ1н
		2ћ1р
		2ћ1с
		2ћ1з
		2ч1ђ
		2ч1ћ
		2ч1ч
		2ч1ш
		2ч1ж
		2ч1б
		2ч1ц
		2ч1д
		2ч1џ
		2ч1ф
		2ч1г
		2ч1х
		2ч1ј
		2ч1к
		2ч1љ
		2ч1м
		2ч1н
		2ч1р
		2ч1с
		2ч1т
		2ч1з
		2ч3вј
		2ч3вл
		2ч3вљ
		2чв.
		2ш1ђ
		2ш1ш
		2ш1ж
		2ш1б
		2ш1д
		2ш1џ
		2ш1ф
		2ш1г
		2ш1х
		2ш1ј
		2ш1р
		2ш1с
		2ш1з
		2ш3чв
		2ш3цј
		2ш3цв
		2ш3мј
		2ш3мл
		2ш3мљ
		2ш3пј
		2ш3пл
		2ш3пљ
		2ш3тј
		2ш3тл
		2ш3тљ
		2ш3вл
		2ш3вљ
		2шћ.
		2шч.
		2шчћ
		2шчч
		2шчш
		2шчж
		2шчб
		2шчц
		2шчд
		2шчџ
		2шчф
		2шчг
		2шчх
		2шчј
		2шчк
		2шчљ
		2шчм
		2шчн
		2шчр
		2шчс
		2шчт
		2шчз
		2шц.
		2шцћ
		2шцч
		2шцш
		2шцж
		2шцб
		2шцц
		2шцд
		2шцџ
		2шцф
		2шцг
		2шцх
		2шцк
		2шцљ
		2шцм
		2шцн
		2шцр
		2шцс
		2шцт
		2шцз
		2шк.
		2шкђ
		2шкћ
		2шкч
		2шкш
		2шкж
		2шкб
		2шкц
		2шкд
		2шкџ
		2шкф
		2шкг
		2шкх
		2шкк
		2шкм
		2шкн
		2шкс
		2шкт
		2шкз
		2шљ.
		2шм.
		2шмђ
		2шмч
		2шмш
		2шмж
		2шмб
		2шмц
		2шмд
		2шмџ
		2шмф
		2шмг
		2шмх
		2шмк
		2шмм
		2шмн
		2шмс
		2шмт
		2шмз
		2шн.
		2шп.
		2шпђ
		2шпч
		2шпш
		2шпж
		2шпб
		2шпц
		2шпд
		2шпџ
		2шпф
		2шпг
		2шпх
		2шпк
		2шпм
		2шпн
		2шпс
		2шпт
		2шпз
		2шт.
		2штђ
		2штч
		2штш
		2штж
		2штб
		2штц
		2штд
		2штџ
		2штф
		2штг
		2штх
		2штк
		2штм
		2штн
		2штс
		2штт
		2штз
		2шв.
		2швђ
		2швч
		2швш
		2швж
		2швб
		2швц
		2швд
		2швџ
		2швф
		2швг
		2швх
		2швк
		2швм
		2швн
		2швс
		2швт
		2швз
		2ж1ћ
		2ж1ч
		2ж1ш
		2ж1ж
		2ж1ц
		2ж1џ
		2ж1ф
		2ж1х
		2ж1ј
		2ж1к
		2ж1р
		2ж1с
		2ж1т
		2ж1з
		2ж3бј
		2ж3бл
		2ж3бљ
		2ж3бр
		2ж3дј
		2ж3дл
		2ж3дљ
		2ж3дв
		2ж3гј
		2ж3гл
		2ж3гљ
		2ж3гр
		2ж3гв
		2ж3мј
		2ж3мл
		2ж3мљ
		2ж3мр
		2ж3вл
		2ж3вљ
		2жђ.
		2жб.
		2жбђ
		2жбч
		2жбш
		2жбж
		2жбб
		2жбц
		2жбд
		2жбџ
		2жбф
		2жбг
		2жбх
		2жбк
		2жбм
		2жбн
		2жбс
		2жбт
		2жбз
		2жд.
		2ждч
		2ждш
		2ждб
		2ждц
		2ждд
		2ждџ
		2ждф
		2ждг
		2ждх
		2ждк
		2ждм
		2ждн
		2ждс
		2ждт
		2ждз
		2жг.
		2жгч
		2жгш
		2жгж
		2жгб
		2жгц
		2жгд
		2жгџ
		2жгф
		2жгг
		2жгх
		2жгк
		2жгм
		2жгн
		2жгс
		2жгт
		2жгз
		2жл.
		2жљ.
		2жм.
		2жмђ
		2жмч
		2жмш
		2жмж
		2жмб
		2жмц
		2жмд
		2жмџ
		2жмф
		2жмг
		2жмх
		2жмк
		2жмм
		2жмн
		2жмс
		2жмт
		2жмз
		2жн.
		2жњ.
		2жвђ
		2жвч
		2жвш
		2жвж
		2жвб
		2жвц
		2жвд
		2жвџ
		2жвф
		2жвг
		2жвх
		2жвк
		2жвм
		2жвн
		2жвс
		2жвт
		2жвз
		2а1
		2б1ђ
		2б1ћ
		2б1ч
		2б1ш
		2б1ж
		2б1б
		2б1ц
		2б1д
		2б1џ
		2б1ф
		2б1г
		2б1х
		2б1к
		2б1м
		2б1н
		2б1с
		2б1т
		2б1з
		2бј.
		2бл.
		2бљ.
		2бр.
		2ц1ђ
		2ц1ћ
		2ц1ч
		2ц1ш
		2ц1ж
		2ц1б
		2ц1ц
		2ц1д
		2ц1џ
		2ц1ф
		2ц1г
		2ц1х
		2ц1к
		2ц1љ
		2ц1м
		2ц1н
		2ц1с
		2ц1т
		2ц1з
		2ц3вл
		2ц3вљ
		2цј.
		2цр.
		2цв.
		2д1ђ
		2д1ћ
		2д1ч
		2д1ш
		2д1б
		2д1ц
		2д1д
		2д1џ
		2д1ф
		2д1г
		2д1х
		2д1к
		2д1м
		2д1н
		2д1с
		2д1т
		2д1з
		2д3вл
		2д3вљ
		2д3вр
		2џ1ђ
		2џ1ћ
		2џ1ч
		2џ1ш
		2џ1ж
		2џ1б
		2џ1ц
		2џ1д
		2џ1џ
		2џ1ф
		2џ1г
		2џ1х
		2џ1ј
		2џ1к
		2џ1љ
		2џ1м
		2џ1н
		2џ1р
		2џ1с
		2џ1т
		2џ1з
		2џ.
		2дј.
		2дл.
		2дљ.
		2др.
		2дв.
		2е1
		2ф1ђ
		2ф1ћ
		2ф1ч
		2ф1ш
		2ф1ж
		2ф1б
		2ф1ц
		2ф1д
		2ф1џ
		2ф1ф
		2ф1г
		2ф1х
		2ф1к
		2ф1м
		2ф1н
		2ф1с
		2ф1т
		2ф1з
		2фј.
		2фл.
		2фљ.
		2фр.
		2г1ђ
		2г1ћ
		2г1ч
		2г1ш
		2г1ж
		2г1б
		2г1ц
		2г1д
		2г1џ
		2г1ф
		2г1г
		2г1х
		2г1к
		2г1м
		2г1н
		2г1с
		2г1т
		2г1з
		2г3вј
		2г3вл
		2г3вљ
		2г3вр
		2гј.
		2гл.
		2гљ.
		2гр.
		2гв.
		2х1ђ
		2х1ћ
		2х1ч
		2х1ш
		2х1ж
		2х1б
		2х1ц
		2х1д
		2х1џ
		2х1ф
		2х1г
		2х1х
		2х1к
		2х1м
		2х1н
		2х1с
		2х1т
		2х1з
		2х3вј
		2х3вл
		2х3вљ
		2х3вр
		2хј.
		2хл.
		2хљ.
		2хр.
		2хв.
		2хвђ
		2хвч
		2хвш
		2хвж
		2хвб
		2хвц
		2хвд
		2хвџ
		2хвф
		2хвг
		2хвх
		2хвк
		2хвм
		2хвн
		2хвс
		2хвт
		2хвз
		2и1
		2ј1ђ
		2ј1ћ
		2ј1ч
		2ј1ш
		2ј1ж
		2ј1б
		2ј1ц
		2ј1д
		2ј1џ
		2ј1ф
		2ј1г
		2ј1х
		2ј1ј
		2ј1к
		2ј1љ
		2ј1м
		2ј1н
		2ј1р
		2ј1с
		2ј1т
		2ј1з
		2к1ђ
		2к1ћ
		2к1ч
		2к1ш
		2к1ж
		2к1б
		2к1ц
		2к1д
		2к1џ
		2к1ф
		2к1г
		2к1х
		2к1к
		2к1м
		2к1н
		2к1с
		2к1т
		2к1з
		2к3вј
		2к3вл
		2к3вљ
		2кј.
		2кл.
		2кљ.
		2кр.
		2кв.
		2љ1ђ
		2љ1ћ
		2љ1ч
		2љ1ш
		2љ1ж
		2љ1б
		2љ1ц
		2љ1д
		2љ1џ
		2љ1ф
		2љ1г
		2љ1х
		2љ1ј
		2љ1к
		2љ1љ
		2љ1м
		2љ1н
		2љ1р
		2љ1с
		2љ1т
		2љ1з
		2м1ђ
		2м1ћ
		2м1ч
		2м1ш
		2м1ж
		2м1б
		2м1ц
		2м1д
		2м1џ
		2м1ф
		2м1г
		2м1х
		2м1к
		2м1м
		2м1н
		2м1с
		2м1т
		2м1з
		2мј.
		2мл.
		2мљ.
		2мр.
		2н1ђ
		2н1ћ
		2н1ч
		2н1ш
		2н1ж
		2н1б
		2н1ц
		2н1д
		2н1џ
		2н1ф
		2н1г
		2н1х
		2н1к
		2н1љ
		2н1м
		2н1н
		2н1р
		2н1с
		2н1т
		2н1з
		2о1
		2пј.
		2пл.
		2пљ.
		2пр.
		2р1ђ
		2р1ћ
		2р1ч
		2р1ш
		2р1ж
		2р1б
		2р1ц
		2р1д
		2р1џ
		2р1ф
		2р1г
		2р1х
		2р1ј
		2р1к
		2р1љ
		2р1м
		2р1н
		2р1р
		2р1с
		2р1т
		2р1з
		2с1ђ
		2с1ћ
		2с1ч
		2с1ш
		2с1ж
		2с1б
		2с1д
		2с1џ
		2с1ф
		2с1г
		2с1х
		2с1с
		2с1з
		2с3кј
		2с3кљ
		2с3тл
		2с3вљ
		2сц.
		2сцђ
		2сцћ
		2сцч
		2сцш
		2сцж
		2сцб
		2сцц
		2сцд
		2сцџ
		2сцф
		2сцг
		2сцх
		2сцк
		2сцљ
		2сцм
		2сцн
		2сцр
		2сцс
		2сцт
		2сцз
		2сј.
		2ск.
		2скђ
		2скћ
		2скч
		2скш
		2скж
		2скб
		2скц
		2скд
		2скџ
		2скф
		2скг
		2скх
		2скк
		2скм
		2скн
		2скс
		2скт
		2скз
		2сл.
		2сљ.
		2см.
		2смђ
		2смћ
		2смч
		2смш
		2смж
		2смб
		2смц
		2смд
		2смџ
		2смф
		2смг
		2смх
		2смк
		2смм
		2смн
		2смс
		2смт
		2смз
		2сн.
		2сњ.
		2сп.
		2спђ
		2спћ
		2спч
		2спш
		2спж
		2спб
		2спц
		2спд
		2спџ
		2спф
		2спг
		2спх
		2спк
		2спм
		2спн
		2спп
		2спс
		2спт
		2спв
		2спз
		2ср.
		2ст.
		2стђ
		2стћ
		2стч
		2стш
		2стж
		2стб
		2стц
		2стд
		2стџ
		2стф
		2стг
		2стх
		2стк
		2стм
		2стн
		2стп
		2стс
		2стт
		2стз
		2св.
		2свђ
		2свћ
		2свч
		2свш
		2свж
		2свб
		2свц
		2свд
		2свџ
		2свф
		2свг
		2свх
		2свк
		2свм
		2свн
		2свп
		2свс
		2свт
		2свв
		2свз
		2т1ђ
		2т1ћ
		2т1ч
		2т1ш
		2т1ж
		2т1б
		2т1ц
		2т1д
		2т1џ
		2т1ф
		2т1г
		2т1х
		2т1к
		2т1м
		2т1н
		2т1п
		2т1с
		2т1т
		2т1з
		2т3вј
		2т3вл
		2т3вљ
		2тј.
		2тл.
		2тљ.
		2тр.
		2тв.
		2у1
		2в1ђ
		2в1ћ
		2в1ч
		2в1ш
		2в1ж
		2в1б
		2в1ц
		2в1д
		2в1џ
		2в1ф
		2в1г
		2в1х
		2в1к
		2в1м
		2в1н
		2в1п
		2в1с
		2в1т
		2в1в
		2в1з
		2вј.
		2вл.
		2вљ.
		2вр.
		2з1ђ
		2з1ћ
		2з1ч
		2з1ш
		2з1ж
		2з1ц
		2з1џ
		2з1ф
		2з1х
		2з1к
		2з1п
		2з1с
		2з1з
		2з3бљ
		2з3дл
		2з3дљ
		2з3дв
		2з3гј
		2з3гљ
		2з3мл
		2з3мр
		2з3вл
		2з3вљ
		2зб.
		2збђ
		2збћ
		2збч
		2збш
		2збж
		2збб
		2збц
		2збд
		2збџ
		2збф
		2збг
		2збх
		2збк
		2збм
		2збн
		2збп
		2збс
		2збв
		2збз
		2зд.
		2здђ
		2здћ
		2здч
		2здш
		2здб
		2здц
		2здд
		2здџ
		2здф
		2здг
		2здх
		2здк
		2здм
		2здн
		2здп
		2здс
		2здз
		2зг.
		2згђ
		2згћ
		2згч
		2згж
		2згб
		2згц
		2згд
		2згџ
		2згф
		2згг
		2згх
		2згк
		2згм
		2згн
		2згп
		2згс
		2згз
		2зј.
		2зл.
		2зљ.
		2зм.
		2змђ
		2змћ
		2змч
		2змш
		2змж
		2змб
		2змц
		2змд
		2змџ
		2змф
		2змг
		2змх
		2змк
		2змм
		2змн
		2змп
		2змс
		2змв
		2змз
		2зн.
		2зњ.
		2зр.
		2зв.
		2звђ
		2звћ
		2звч
		2звш
		2звж
		2звб
		2звц
		2звд
		2звџ
		2звф
		2звг
		2звх
		2звк
		2звм
		2звн
		2звп
		2звс
		2звв
		2звз
		3ч2лан
		3ч2лањ
		3б2дењ
		3б2дет
		3б2дјењ
		3б2дјет
		3ц2мач
		3ц2мак
		3ц2миз
		3ц2мок
		3г2дегод.
		3г2декад
		3г2декак
		3г2дјегод.
		3г2дјекад
		3г2дјекак
		3г2мил
		3г2миљ
		3г2миз
		3г2нај
		3г2нежђ
		3г2нев
		3г2незд
		3г2нијежђ
		3г2нијезд
		3г2њав
		3г2њеч
		3г2њес
		3г2њет
		3г2њев
		3г2њил
		3г2њиљ
		3г2њио
		3г2њит
		3г2њур
		3г2ној
		3г2нос
		3г2ноз
		3х2тел
		3х2тењ
		3х2тети
		3х2тев
		3х2тјел
		3х2тјењ
		3х2тјети
		3х2тјев
		3к2неж
		3к2нез
		3к2њиж
		3к2њиг
		3м2наж
		3м2нож
		3м2ног
		3п2сич
		3п2сик
		3п2сов
		3п2суј
		3р2ђа
		3с2фер
		3т2маст
		3т2мул
		3т2муљ
		3т2муо
		3т2мур
		4р3је.
		4р3јем
		ч2в
		ш2ч
		ш2л
		ш2љ
		ш2м
		ш2н
		ш2п
		ш2т
		ш2в
		ж2ђ
		ж2б
		ж2д
		ж2г
		ж2л
		ж2љ
		ж2м
		ж2н
		ж2в
		а3а
		а3е
		а3и
		а3о
		а3у
		б2ј
		б2л
		б2љ
		б2р
		ц2ј
		ц2р
		ц2в
		д2ж
		д2ј
		д2л
		д2љ
		д2р
		д2в
		е3а
		е3е
		е3и
		е3о
		е3у
		ф2ј
		ф2л
		ф2љ
		ф2р
		г2л
		г2љ
		г2р
		г2в
		х2л
		х2љ
		х2р
		х2в
		и3а
		и3е
		и3и
		и3о
		и3у
		к2л
		к2љ
		к2р
		к2в
		л2ј
		м2л
		м2љ
		м2р
		не3г2де.
		не3г2дје.
		ни3г2де.
		ни3г2дје.
		о3а
		о3е
		о3и
		о3о
		о3у
		п2ј
		п2л
		п2љ
		п2р
		с2ц
		с2к
		с2л
		с2љ
		с2м
		с2н
		с2п
		с2р
		с2в
		т2ј
		т2л
		т2в
		у3а
		у3е
		у3и
		у3о
		у3у
		в2л
		в2љ
		в2р
		з2б
		з2д
		з2г
		з2ј
		з2л
		з2љ
		з2м
		з2н
		з2р
		з2в
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
